Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 414.031, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Initiating the proceeding. (a) A proceeding for the annexation of unincorporated property abutting a municipality may be initiated by submitting to the chief administrative law judge and the affected township one of the following: (1) a resolution of the annexing municipality; (2) a resolution of the township containing the area proposed for annexation; (3) a petition of 20 percent of the property owners or 100 property owners, whichever is less, in the area to be annexed; (4) a resolution of the municipal council together with a resolution of the township board stating their desire to have the entire township annexed to the municipality. (b) The petition, or resolution shall set forth the boundaries of the territory proposed for annexation, the names of all parties entitled to notice under section 414.09, and the reasons for requesting annexation. (c) If the proceeding is initiated by a petition of property owners, the petition shall be accompanied by a resolution of the annexing municipality supporting the petition. new text begin (d) The owner or operator of a facility to mine aggregate material, as defined under section 298.75, is not an eligible property owner under paragraph (a), clause (3), and may not initiate a proceeding for annexation under this subdivision. new text end